Hawaii, session 2026, SB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii invasive species council was established in 2003 to provide policy level direction, coordination, and planning among federal agencies, state departments, and international and local initiatives for the control and eradication of harmful invasive species infestations throughout the State and to prevent the introduction of other potentially harmful invasive species.  However, the initiatives of the Hawaii invasive species council remain underfunded. The legislature further finds that invasive species are the single greatest threat to Hawaii's economy, natural environment, food security, and local communities.  Additional funding for the Hawaii invasive species council would assist in the establishment of species-specific response teams on each island and increase the capacity of on-the-ground response efforts for high-impact pests like little fire ants, coqui frogs, and coconut rhinoceros beetles that continue to spread throughout the State. The legislature also finds that, with adequate funding, Maui has drastically reduced and nearly eradicated a little fire ant infestation that encompassed one hundred forty-two acres by utilizing innovative new control tools and techniques. Additional funding for the Hawaii invasive species council would also support research projects at the university of Hawaii and other research institutions to continue to develop new tools and technology for invasive species detection, prevention, and management. To align with the special purpose of the Hawaii invasive species council, a portion of the additional funding should also be reserved to support rapid response efforts to new pest incursions. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the Hawaii invasive species council to support its initiatives to control and eradicate invasive species in the State. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Hawaii invasive species council to support its initiatives to control and eradicate invasive species in the State. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________